Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.740

Adjudicative proceedings.

In all adjudicative proceedings before the secretary or the department, the secretary may delegate initial decision-making authority to a presiding officer. The presiding officer shall enter an initial order pursuant to RCW 34.05.461 subject to the review of the secretary or his or her designee. Pursuant to RCW 34.05.464, the secretary may, by rule, provide that initial orders in specified classes of cases may become final without further agency action unless, within a specified time period:

(1) The secretary upon his or her own motion determines that the initial order should be reviewed; or

(2) A party to the proceedings files a petition for administrative review of the initial order.

[ 2013 c 109 s 3.]